Florida, session 2026, HB159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Effective October 1, 2026, subsection (4) of
section 790.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
790.25 Lawful ownership, possession, and use of firearms
and other weapons.—
(4) POSSESSION IN PRIVATE CONVEYANCE.—
(a)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. and
notwithstanding s. 790.01, a person 18 years of age or older who
is in lawful possession of a handgun or other weapon may possess
such a handgun or weapon within the interior of a private
conveyance if the handgun or weapon is securely encased or
otherwise not readily accessible for immediate use. A person who
possesses a handgun or other weapon as authorized under this
subparagraph paragraph may not carry the handgun or weapon on
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb159-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 159 2026
his or her person.
2.a. A person may not store a handgun, whether loaded or
unloaded, in an unoccupied, unsecured private conveyance or
vessel unless the handgun is kept from ordinary observation and
view and secured with a device or mechanism that is securely
affixed to the private conveyance or vessel or kept locked
within a trunk, utility or glove box, or other locked container.
b. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term:
(I) "Private conveyance" includes any motor vehicle as
defined in s. 790.251(2)(b) other than a public conveyance.
(II) "Unsecured" means unlocked or otherwise left open to
entry.
(III) "Vessel" has the same meaning as in s. 327.02.
c. Each law enforcement agency shall engage in a
promotional campaign to educate the public and handgun owners
regarding the requirements of sub-subparagraph a.
d. The curricula of the firearms education, safety, and
training courses specified in s. 790.06(2)(h)1.-4. and 7. shall
contain instruction on the requirements of sub-subparagraph a.
Section 2. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 790.175,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
790.175 Transfer or sale of firearms; required warnings;
penalties.—
(1) Upon the retail commercial sale or retail transfer of
any firearm, the seller or transferor shall deliver a written
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb159-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 159 2026
warning to the purchaser or transferee, which warning states, in
block letters not less than 1/4 inch in height:
"IT IS UNLAWFUL, AND PUNISHABLE BY IMPRISONMENT AND FINE, FOR
ANY ADULT TO STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM IN ANY PLACE WITHIN THE
REACH OR EASY ACCESS OF A MINOR UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OR TO
KNOWINGLY SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR POSSESSION OF
A FIREARM TO A MINOR OR A PERSON OF UNSOUND MIND. A PERSON MAY
NOT STORE A HANDGUN, WHETHER LOADED OR UNLOADED, IN AN
UNOCCUPIED, UNSECURED PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL UNLESS THE
HANDGUN IS KEPT FROM ORDINARY OBSERVATION AND VIEW AND SECURED
WITH A DEVICE OR MECHANISM THAT IS SECURELY AFFIXED TO THE
PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL OR KEPT LOCKED WITHIN A TRUNK,
UTILITY OR GLOVE BOX, OR OTHER LOCKED CONTAINER."
(2) Any retail or wholesale store, shop, or sales outlet
which sells firearms must conspicuously post at each purchase
counter the following warning in block letters not less than 1
inch in height:
"IT IS UNLAWFUL TO STORE OR LEAVE A FIREARM IN ANY PLACE WITHIN
THE REACH OR EASY ACCESS OF A MINOR UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE OR TO
KNOWINGLY SELL OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OR POSSESSION OF
A FIREARM TO A MINOR OR A PERSON OF UNSOUND MIND. A PERSON MAY
NOT STORE A HANDGUN, WHETHER LOADED OR UNLOADED, IN AN
UNOCCUPIED, UNSECURED PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL UNLESS THE
HANDGUN IS KEPT FROM ORDINARY OBSERVATION AND VIEW AND SECURED
WITH A DEVICE OR MECHANISM THAT IS SECURELY AFFIXED TO THE
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb159-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 159 2026
PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OR VESSEL OR KEPT LOCKED WITHIN A TRUNK,
100 UTILITY OR GLOVE BOX, OR OTHER LOCKED CONTAINER."
101 Section 3. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide
102 for the most efficient and effective deterrent to juvenile theft
103 of handguns from vessels and conveyances, tailored to local
104 conditions and resources. Therefore, the Legislature determines
105 and declares that this act fulfills an important state interest.
106 Section 4. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
107 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb159-00